Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.340

Emergency medical service districts—Board of trustees—Officers—Annual report.

The chair of the county legislative authority, or the chair's designee, shall be chair of the emergency medical service district board of trustees, and the county auditor, or the auditor's designee, shall be the secretary-treasurer of the emergency medical service district board of trustees.

The secretary shall keep a public record of all proceedings and of all receipts and disbursements made by the emergency medical service district board of trustees, shall make an annual report of its expenses and disbursements with a full list of the beneficiaries of the principal fund in the county, and shall make all required reports to the state board. The state board shall provide all necessary forms to emergency worker boards of trustees.

[ 1999 c 148 s 30; 1993 c 331 s 3.]